Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1527
Failure to complete remedial action; reimburse fund.

If the responsible person who has received partial reimbursement from the fund for remedial action does not complete the remedial action as required by the rules and regulations, the responsible person shall reimburse to the fund an amount equal to the reimbursements received from the fund.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 27.